Wyoming, session 2025, HB0224.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 34-15-104 is created to read:

HB0224

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0289
34-15-104. Restriction on foreign adversary ownership
of land; definitions; registration; penalty; enforcement.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Land" means any interest in real property
or real estate and any surface, subsurface, airspace or
mineral interest in Wyoming;

(ii) "Foreign adversary" means:

(A) A business entity, whether or not
incorporated, in which a majority interest is owned, held
or controlled directly or indirectly by foreign persons or
by a foreign government;

(B) A foreign government of:

(I) Russia;

(II) China;

HB0224

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0289
(III) Any country that has been
designated as a state sponsor of terrorism under federal
law;

(IV) Any country subject to
international traffic in arms regulations that is
identified or named in 22 C.F.R. § 126.1(d); or

(V) Any county that has been
designated as a foreign adversary under 15 C.F.R. § 791.4.

(C) A foreign person, including a person
who is a nonresident alien, and who is a citizen of:

(I) Russia;

(II) China;

(III) A country that has been
designated as a state sponsor of terrorism under federal
law;

HB0224

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0289
(IV) A country subject to
international traffic in arms regulations that is
identified or named in 22 C.F.R. § 126.1(d); or

(V) A county that has been designated
as a foreign adversary under 15 C.F.R. § 791.4.

(b) No foreign adversary, or any agent, trustee or
fiduciary thereof, shall purchase or otherwise acquire any
interest in land in Wyoming except for a personal residence
for personal use that is located on not more than one (1)
acre of land.

(c) A foreign adversary, or any agent, trustee or
fiduciary thereof, that acquires any interest in land in
Wyoming on or after July 1, 2025 pursuant to subsection (b)
of this section, shall register the ownership with the
office of homeland security in accordance with the
following:

(i) The registration shall be in a form and
manner prescribed by the office of homeland security;

HB0224

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0289
(ii) The registration shall contain the name of
the owner, the location of the land, the number of acres of
the land or the nature of the interest in the land and, if
the owner is an agent, trustee or fiduciary of a foreign
adversary, the name of any principal;

(iii) The initial registration shall be made not
later than sixty (60) days after July 1, 2025 or within
sixty (60) days of acquisition of the interest in land,
whichever is later;

(iv) The registration shall be updated annually
on or before March 31 of each year.

(d) A foreign adversary, or any agent, trustee or
fiduciary thereof, who fails to register, timely register
or update registration annually as required by subsection
(c) of this section shall be liable for a civil penalty of
five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each day that the
prohibited person, or any agent, trustee or fiduciary
thereof, is not in compliance with subsection (c) of this
section.

HB0224

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0289
(e) Each county clerk shall report to the office of
homeland security if a foreign adversary, or any agent,
trustee or fiduciary thereof, purchases or acquires any
interest in land in the county in violation of this
section.

(f) The office of homeland security shall report any
violation of this section to the attorney general if the
office of homeland security finds that a foreign adversary,
or any agent, trustee or fiduciary thereof, has acquired or
holds title to or any interest in land in violation of this
section or has failed to register or update registration as
required by subsection (c) of this section.

(g) The attorney general may take any action
necessary to enforce the provisions of this section,
including initiating an action in the district court of any
county in which the interest in land is located for a court
order for a civil judgment against the foreign adversary in
the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each
day that the foreign adversary, or any agent, trustee or
fiduciary thereof, is not in compliance with subsection (c)
HB0224

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0289
of this section. Any civil penalty collected shall be
credited to the general fund.

Section 2. W.S. 39-13-103(b)(viii) and
39-13-107(b)(i)(C) are amended to read:

39-13-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

(viii) Every assessment schedule sent to a
taxpayer shall contain the property's estimated fair market
value for the current and previous year, or, productive
value in the case of agricultural property. The schedule
shall also contain the assessment ratio as provided by
paragraph (b)(iii) of this section for the taxable
property, the amount of taxes assessed on the taxable
property from the previous year, an estimate of the taxes
which will be due and payable for the current year based on
the previous year's mill levies and, if the property is a
single family residential structure, an estimate of the
taxes that will be avoided if the property is eligible for
the exemptions under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xliii) and (xliv).
HB0224

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0289
The schedule shall also contain information stating that
foreign adversary ownership of land in Wyoming is
prohibited as provided by W.S. 34-15-104 and describing the
requirement to register foreign adversary ownership of any
interest in land, including a personal residence for
personal use that is on not more than one (1) acre, with
the office of homeland security as provided by W.S.
34-15-104. The schedule shall contain a statement of the
process to contest assessments as prescribed by W.S.
39-13-109(b)(i);

39-13-107. Compliance; collection procedures.

(b) The following provisions shall apply to the
payment of taxes, distraint of property and deferral:

(i) The following shall apply to the payment of
taxes due:

(C) Annually, on or before October 10 the
county treasurer shall send a written statement to each
taxpayer by mail at his last known address or, if offered
by the county and upon request of the taxpayer, by
HB0224

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0289
electronic transmission of the total tax due, itemized as
to property description, assessed value and mill levies.
The notice shall contain information, including contact
information, of any property tax relief program authorized
by state law and, if the property is a single family
residential structure, the taxes that will be avoided
pursuant to the exemptions under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xliii)
and (xliv). The notice shall contain information stating
that foreign adversary ownership of land in Wyoming is
prohibited as provided by W.S. 34-15-104 and describing the
requirement to register foreign adversary ownership of any
interest in land, including a personal residence for
personal use that is on not more than one (1) acre, with
the office of homeland security as provided by W.S.
34-15-104. Failure to send notice, or to demand payment of
taxes, does not invalidate any taxes due;

Section 3. Except as provided in W.S. 34-15-104(b)
and (g), as created by section 1 of this act, nothing in
this act shall be construed to divest, extinguish or sever
any interest in or claim to real property or real estate,
surface, subsurface, airspace or mineral interests in
HB0224

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0289
Wyoming. This act shall apply to land purchases made on or
after the effective date of this act.

Section 4. The office of homeland security shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this act.

Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0224